Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1348.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Known as the Festival of Breaking the Fast, approximately 2,000,000,000 Muslims around the world celebrate Eid al-Fitr to mark the end of the holy month of Ramadan.(2) The date of Eid al-Fitr is determined by the sighting of the crescent moon to mark the beginning of the new lunar month of Shawwal.(3) Eid al-Fitr includes two to three days of celebrations and it begins with a special prayer service at the mosque.(4) Eid al-Fitr is also a time for Muslims to perform 123456789101112131415161718 acts of charity and to forgive and seek forgiveness.(5) Many Pennsylvanians celebrate Eid al-Fitr, and this important holiday deserves official recognition.Section 2. Designation.In accordance with Islamic religious law and tradition, the first day of the Islamic lunar month of Shawwal shall be designated as Eid al-Fitr Day in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring an employer to treat Eid al-Fitr Day as a legal or official holiday or to provide paid leave to an employee on Eid al-Fitr Day solely by virtue of the date being designated under this act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1348PN1536 - 2 - 1234567891011121314